New York, session 2025-2026, A399.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-eeee to read as follows: 3 § 396-eeee. Robots and uncrewed aircraft equipped or mounted with 4 weapons prohibited. 1. As used in this section, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Robotic device" means a mechanical device capable of locomotion, 7 navigation, or movement on the ground and that operates at a distance 8 from its operator or supervisor, based on commands or in response to 9 sensor data, artificial intelligence, or a combination thereof. 10 (b) "Uncrewed aircraft" means an aircraft that is operated without the 11 possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft. 12 (c) "Weapon" means any device designed to threaten or cause death, 13 incapacitation, or physical injury to any person, including but not 14 limited to stun guns, firearms, machine guns, chemical agents or irri- 15 tants, kinetic impact projectiles, weaponized lasers, flamethrowers and 16 explosive devices. 17 (d) "Law enforcement" means a lawfully established state or local 18 public agency that is responsible for the prevention and detection of 19 crime, the enforcement of local government codes and the enforcement of 20 penal, traffic, regulatory, game or controlled substance laws and 21 includes an agent of the law enforcement agency. 22 (e) "Defense industrial company" means a company that has a contract 23 with the United States department of defense to design, manufacture, 24 develop, modify, upgrade, or produce a robotic device, and includes any EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01109-01-5 A. 399 2 1 employees or agents authorized by that defense industrial company to 2 engage in activities relating to such a contract on its behalf. 3 (f) "Disrupter technology" means a class of devices designed to assist 4 in the disposal of explosives or suspected explosives. 5 2. It shall be unlawful for any person, whether or not acting under 6 color of law, to manufacture, modify, sell, transfer, equip, use, or 7 operate a robotic device or an uncrewed aircraft equipped or mounted 8 with a weapon within the state. 9 3. It shall be unlawful for any person, whether or not acting under 10 color of law, to use a robotic device or uncrewed aircraft to: 11 (a) commit the crime of menacing defined in section 120.15 of the 12 penal law, or 13 (b) criminally harass another person in violation of section 240.25, 14 240.26, 240.30, 240.31, or 240.32 of the penal law. 15 4. It shall be unlawful for any person, whether or not acting under 16 color of law, to use a robotic device or uncrewed aircraft to physically 17 restrain or to attempt to physically restrain a human being within the 18 state. 19 5. Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of subdivision 20 two, three or four of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty 21 of not less than twenty-five thousand nor more than one hundred thousand 22 dollars. Such fine shall be imposed in addition to any other penalty 23 prescribed by law. 24 6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to: 25 (a) a defense industrial company with respect to robotic devices and 26 uncrewed aircraft that are within the scope of its contract with the 27 United States department of defense; or 28 (b) a robotic device developer, manufacturer or producer who modifies 29 or operates a robotic device or uncrewed aircraft equipped or mounted 30 with a weapon for the sole purpose of developing or testing technology 31 that is intended to detect, prevent and/or mitigate the unauthorized 32 weaponization of a robotic device or uncrewed aircraft. 33 7. It shall not be a violation of this section for government offi- 34 cials acting in the public performance of their duties to operate a 35 robotic device or uncrewed aircraft equipped or mounted with a weapon, 36 explosive device, or disrupter technology, when used for the purpose of 37 the disposal of explosives or suspected explosives, for development, 38 evaluation, testing, education or training relating to the use of such 39 technologies for the purpose of disposing of explosives or suspected 40 explosives, or for the destruction of property in cases where there is 41 an imminent, deadly threat to human life. 42 8. Law enforcement shall be required to obtain a warrant, or other 43 legally required judicial authorization, prior to: 44 (a) deploying a robotic device onto private property in any situation 45 in which a warrant would be required if the entry onto that property 46 were made by a human officer; or 47 (b) deploying a robotic device to conduct surveillance or location 48 tracking in any situation in which a warrant or other legally required 49 judicial authorization would be required if such surveillance or track- 50 ing were conducted by a human officer or other technology. 51 9. Any information regarding the use of a robotic device by law 52 enforcement shall be subject to release pursuant to article six of the 53 public officers law, with such information to be made available to the 54 public on request, pursuant to the provisions thereof. 55 10. The attorney general may bring an action to remedy a violation of 56 this section. A. 399 3 1 11. (a) Any individual alleging that a violation of this section or a 2 regulation promulgated under this section caused them injury or harm may 3 bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction. 4 (b) A civil action brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be 5 directed to the agency alleged to have committed the violation or, in 6 the case of an individual, to the person alleged to have committed the 7 violation. 8 (c) In a civil action in which the plaintiff prevails, the court may 9 award: 10 (i) liquidated damages of not less than five hundred dollars nor more 11 than two thousand dollars; 12 (ii) punitive damages; and 13 (iii) any other relief, including but not limited to an injunction, 14 that the court deems to be appropriate. 15 (d) In addition to any relief awarded pursuant to the previous para- 16 graph, the court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to any 17 prevailing plaintiff. 18 12. The attorney general shall promulgate any rules and regulations 19 necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 22 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 23 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 24 on or before such effective date.